West Virginia, session 2025, SB837.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia:ARTICLE 1. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION. §5A-1-11. State of West Virginia Equal Opportunity Coordinator. (a) There is continued within the Department of Administration the position of the State Equal Opportunity Coordinator, who shall be appointed by the Secretary of the Department of Administration. (b) The coordinator must be an employee of the Department of Administration and possess an in-depth working knowledge of the federal Americans with Disabilities Act, Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, The Equal Pay Act of 1963, the Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1977, Sections 102 and 103 of the Civil Rights Act of 1991, Sections 501 and 505 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, and the Genetic Information Nondiscrimination Act of 2008. The coordinator shall also have an in-depth working knowledge of the challenges facing West Virginians covered under these Acts. (c) The coordinator shall:(1) Advise the Director of Personnel in the development of comprehensive policies and programs for the development, implementation, and monitoring of a statewide program to assure compliance with 42 U.S.C. §12101, et seq., the federal Americans with Disabilities Act, Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, The Equal Pay Act of 1963, the Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1977, Sections 102 and 103 of the Civil Rights Act of 1991, Sections 501 and 505 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, and the Genetic Information Nondiscrimination Act of 2008;(2) Assist in the formulation of rules and standards relating to the review, investigation, and resolution of complaints of discrimination in employment, education, housing, and public accommodation; (3) Consult and collaborate with state and federal agency officials to develop compliance programs;(4) Consult, train, and collaborate with, state agencies and state employees on the federal Equal Employment Opportunity Act, Americans with Disabilities Act, and related issues; (5) Represent the state on local, state, and national committees and panels related to the Americans with Disabilities Act and the Equal Employment Opportunity Act;(6) Advise the Governor and agency heads on federal Americans with Disabilities Act and Equal Employment Opportunity Act issues;(7) Consult with state agencies on the hiring and employment of persons with disabilities; and(8) Be available to inspect and advise the Real Estate Division, General Services Division, and the Purchasing Division on physical properties owned or leased by the State of West Virginia for compliance with 42 U.S.C. §12101, et seq., the federal Americans with Disabilities Act.The Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the Senate  		............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates				                  Originated in the Senate. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... President of the Senate  						............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2025.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home